District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-241.07

Penalty for breach of provisions.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1301, ch. 854, § 708
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(4), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-241.07.
1981 Ed., § 29-707.
1973 Ed., § 29-307.

Prior Codifications